Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB185.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 61.595 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1990, upon retirement at normal retirement date or subsequent
thereto, a Kentucky Employees Retirement System member may receive an annual
retirement allowance, payable monthly during his or her lifetime, which shall
consist of an amount equal to one and ninety-seven hundredths percent (1.97%) of
final compensation multiplied by the number of years of service credit, except that:
(a) Effective February 1, 1999, a member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement
System who was participating in one (1) of the state-administered retirement
systems as of January 1, 1998, and continues to participate through January 1,
1999, shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly during
his or her lifetime, which shall consist of an amount equal to two percent (2%)
of final compensation multiplied by the number of years of service credit.
Any Kentucky Employees Retirement System member whose effective date
of retirement is between February 1, 1999, and January 31, 2009, and who has
at least twenty (20) years of service credit in one (1) of the state-administered
retirement systems and who was participating in one (1) of the state-
administered retirement systems as of January 1, 1998, and continues to
participate through January 1, 1999, shall receive an annual retirement
allowance, payable monthly during his or her lifetime, which shall consist of
an amount equal to two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of final compensation
multiplied by the number of years of service credit. Notwithstanding the
provisions of KRS 61.565, the funding for this paragraph shall be provided
from existing funds of the retirement allowance account;
(b) The annual normal retirement allowance for members of the General
Page 1 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
Assembly, who serve during the 1974 or 1976 General Assembly, and will
have eight (8) years or more of total legislative service as of January 6, 1978,
shall not be less than two hundred forty dollars ($240) multiplied by the
number of years of service as a member of the General Assembly;
(c) For a member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System who begins
participating on or after September 1, 2008, the annual retirement allowance
upon retirement shall be equal to:
1. a. One and one-tenth percent (1.1%) of final compensation for each
year of service if the member has earned ten (10) or less years of
service at retirement;
b. One and three-tenths percent (1.3%) of final compensation for
each year of service if the member has earned greater than ten (10)
but no more than twenty (20) years of service at retirement;
c. One and one-half percent (1.5%) of final compensation for each
year of service if the member has earned greater than twenty (20)
but no more than twenty-six (26) years of service at retirement; or
d. One and three-quarters percent (1.75%) of final compensation for
each year of service if the member has earned greater than twenty-
six (26) but no more than thirty (30) years of service at retirement;
and
2. Two percent (2.0%) of final compensation for each year of service
earned in excess of thirty (30) years of service at retirement;
(d) The annual normal retirement allowance for members of the General
Assembly who will have fewer than eight (8) years of service as of December
31, 1975, shall be as prescribed in Chapter 116, section 36(1), Acts of the
1972 General Assembly for legislative service prior to January 1, 1974;
(e) Former members of the General Assembly who have eight (8) or more years
Page 2 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
of legislative service prior to the 1976 Regular Session are eligible for an
increased retirement allowance of two hundred forty dollars ($240) times the
years of legislative service, if the member pays to the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System thirty-five percent (35%) of the actuarial cost of the higher
benefit, as determined by the system, except that a former member with
sixteen (16) or more years of legislative service, or his or her beneficiary, who
is receiving a retirement allowance, also is eligible under this section and may
apply for a recomputation of his or her retirement allowance. The employer's
share of sixty-five percent (65%) of the computed actuarial cost shall be paid
from the State Treasury to the Kentucky Employees Retirement System upon
presentation of a properly documented claim to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet. If any member with sixteen (16) or more years of
legislative service previously applied for and is receiving a retirement
allowance, he or she may reapply and his or her retirement allowance shall be
recomputed in accordance with this paragraph, and he or she shall thereafter
be paid in accordance with the option selected by him or her at the time of the
reapplication; and
(f) The annual normal retirement allowance for a member with ten (10) or more
years of service, in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, at least one
(1) of which is current service, shall not be less than five hundred twelve
dollars ($512).
(2) (a) Upon service retirement prior to normal retirement date, a member may
receive an annual retirement allowance payable monthly during his or her
lifetime which shall be determined in the same manner as for retirement at his
or her normal retirement date with years of service and final compensation
being determined as of the date of his or her actual retirement, but the amount
of the retirement allowance so determined shall be reduced at an amount
Page 3 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
determined by the board's actuary to reflect the earlier commencement of
benefits.
(b) A member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System who begins
participating before September 1, 2008, who has:
1. Twenty-seven (27) or more years of service credit, at least fifteen (15)
of which are current service, may retire with no reduction in the
retirement allowance;[. A member who begins participating before
September 1, 2008, who has]
2. Earned vested service credit in a retirement system, other than the
Teachers' Retirement System, sponsored by a Kentucky institution of
higher education, the Council on Postsecondary Education, or the
Higher Education Assistance Authority, may count the vested service
toward attaining the necessary years of service credit as provided in
KRS 61.559(2)(c) and (d) to qualify for a retirement allowance. The
credit from a Kentucky institution of higher education, the Council on
Postsecondary Education, or the Higher Education Assistance Authority
established by this subparagraph shall not be used toward the minimum
fifteen (15) years of current service required by KRS 61.559(2)(c) and
(d) or to calculate his or her retirement allowance pursuant to this
section; and
3. Employment that provides services for Kentucky River Community
Care in a regular full-time position, regardless of whether the member
was employed directly by Kentucky River Community Care or
indirectly through a third-party entity, in which the member did not
participate in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System for the
period of employment, may count the employment as service toward
attaining the necessary years of service credit as provided in KRS
Page 4 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
61.559(2)(c) and (d) to qualify for a retirement allowance. The credit
for employment from Kentucky River Community Care established by
this subparagraph shall not be used toward the minimum fifteen (15)
years of current service required by KRS 61.559(2)(c) and (d) or to
calculate his or her retirement allowance pursuant to this section,
unless at a later date the employment with Kentucky River Community
Care is determined to have been eligible for participation in the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System and the employee and
employer pay the required costs to establish service in the system for
the period of employment.
The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to limit the use of
Teachers' Retirement System credit pursuant to KRS 61.680(2)(a).
(c) A member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System who begins
participating on or after September 1, 2008, may retire with no reduction in
benefits if the member is fifty-seven (57) years of age or older and has an age
and years of service total of at least eighty-seven (87) years. The years of
service used to determine eligibility for an unreduced retirement allowance
under this paragraph shall only include years of service credited under KRS
16.543(1), 61.543(1), or 78.615(1) or another state-administered retirement
system.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to members who begin
participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014. Members who begin
participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, shall receive the retirement
benefits prescribed by KRS 61.597.
Section 2. KRS 61.552 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Called to Active Duty Military Service. An employee of an employer participating
in the system who is called to active military duty in the Armed Forces of the
Page 5 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
United States shall be credited in accordance with 38 U.S.C. sec. 4318 with service
credit, creditable compensation, and in the case of employees participating in the
hybrid cash balance plan, employee contributions, employer credits, and interest
credits, for a period of active military duty of up to six (6) years, provided:
(a) The employee was called to active military duty in the Armed Forces of the
United States:
1. After the employee's membership date in the system and provided the
employee was on leave of absence from the employer and did not
withdraw his or her accumulated account balance; or
2. Prior to the employee's membership date in the system and the date the
employee terminated employment with his or her employer;
(b) The employee entered active military service within three (3) months of his or
her last day of paid employment;
(c) The employee's discharge military service was terminated in a manner other
than as described in 38 U.S.C. sec. 4304;
(d) The employee returns to work with an employer participating in the system
within two (2) years after completion of the period of active military duty, or
upon the subsequent termination of any total disability which existed at the
expiration of the two (2) years after discharge; and
(e) For an employee whose membership date is on or after January 1, 2014, who
is participating in the hybrid cash balance plan under KRS 16.583, 61.597,
78.5512, or 78.5516, the employee pays the employee contributions on the
credited compensation as provided under KRS 16.543, 61.543, and 78.615.
For periods of active military duty that meet the requirements of this subsection, the
employer shall pay the employer contributions payable under KRS 61.565, 61.702,
78.5536, and 78.635.
(2) (a) Omitted Service. Any person who is entitled to service credit for employment
Page 6 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
which was not reported by the employer in accordance with KRS 16.543,
61.543, or 78.615 may obtain credit for the service subject to the provisions of
this subsection.
(b) Provided the person pays for the omitted service with within six (6) months of
notification by the system, the cost of the service shall be equal to the
employee contributions that would have been paid if the person had been
correctly reported in accordance with KRS 16.543, 61.543, or 78.615.
(c) Any employee participating in one (1) of the state-administered retirement
systems entitled to service credit under paragraph (a) of this subsection who
has not repaid the employee contributions due within six (6) months of
notification by the system may purchase the credit after the six (6) months by
paying to the system the employee contributions plus interest at the actuarially
assumed rate from the date of initial notification under paragraph (b) of this
subsection.
(d) Omitted service purchased under this subsection shall:
1. Be considered service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), or
78.615(1) for purposes of determining eligibility for retirement benefits
under KRS 78.510 to 78.852; and
2. Not be credited to the member's account until the employer
contributions due and any interest or penalties on the delinquent
employer contributions for the period of omitted service are received by
the system.
(e) Employees who begin participating on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid
cash balance plan provided by KRS 16.583 or 61.597 or 78.5512 or 78.5516
shall, upon payment of the employee and employer contributions due under
this subsection, have their accumulated account balance increased by the
employee contributions, employer pay credits, and interest credits that would
Page 7 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
have been credited to their member's account if the contributions had been
paid on time.
(f) Contributions payable by the employer under this subsection for omitted
service shall be considered delinquent from the date the employee should
have been reported and received service credit in accordance with KRS
16.543, 61.543, and 78.615.
(3) (a) Recontribution of a Refund. Any employee participating in one (1) of the
state-administered retirement systems who has been refunded his or her
accumulated account balance under the provisions of KRS 61.625, thereby
losing service credit in the system, may regain the credit by paying to the
system the amount or amounts refunded by the system with interest at a rate
determined by the board. Service purchased under this subsection on or after
January 1, 2014, shall not be used to determine the member's membership
date in the systems.
(b) Recontribution of a refund purchased under this subsection shall not be used
in determining a retirement allowance until the member has accrued at least
six (6) months of service credit in a state-administered retirement system,
excluding the service purchased under this subsection. If the member does not
accrue at least six (6) months of service credit in a state-administered
retirement system, excluding service purchased under this subsection, then the
payment plus interest as provided in KRS 16.560, 61.575, or 78.640 shall be
refunded upon retirement, death, or written request following termination of
employment. The service requirement shall be waived if the member dies or
becomes disabled as provided for by KRS 16.582, 61.600, 61.621, 78.5522, or
78.5524.
(4) (a) Summer Months. Any employee participating in one (1) of the state-
administered retirement systems who is or has been employed by a school
Page 8 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
board or community action agency participating in the County Employees
Retirement System or a state-operated school under KRS Chapter 167 or an
institution of higher learning participating in the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System, who receives service credit for less than twelve (12)
months each year, may purchase the additional months of service credit
needed to total one (1) year of service credit, except the amount purchased for
any specific year shall not exceed three (3) months.
(b) The cost of the summer months service credit shall be determined by the
formula established by subsection (10) of this section and may be purchased
by the employee, or the employer on behalf of the employee, or the cost may
be paid by both the employer and employee in which case the employer and
employee shall each pay fifty percent (50%) of the cost. Service credit shall
not be credited to the member's account until both the employer's and
employee's payment are received by the system.
(c) If the employee has purchased service credit under this subsection based on
months reported by the employer for the fiscal year, and an audit of the
employee's account reduces the number of months of service credit for which
the employee is eligible to no fewer than nine (9) months, the employee shall
retain credit for the months purchased unless the employee is ineligible for
any service in the fiscal year. The employee shall be eligible to purchase the
additional months under this subsection to total one (1) year.
(d) This subsection shall not apply to members who began participating in the
County Employees Retirement System on or after January 1, 2014.
(5) Vested Service Purchases. Any employee who began participating in the County
Employees Retirement System, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, or the
State Police Retirement System prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested may
purchase service credit for:
Page 9 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
(a) Past service. "Past service" means periods of employment:
1. Between July 1, 1956, in the case of the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System, or July 1, 1958, in the case of the County
Employees Retirement System, and the effective date of participation by
the employer; or
2. With a public agency that did not participate in the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System but would have been eligible to participate under
KRS 61.520 or a political subdivision that did not participate in the
County Employees Retirement System but would have been eligible to
participate under KRS 78.530, provided the public agency or political
subdivision has merged with or been taken over by a participating
employer;
(b) State university service, provided the university does not participate in a state-
administered retirement system and the university service being purchased
was in a nonteaching position that did not participate in a defined benefit
retirement program;
(c) 1. Up to ten (10) years of out-of-state service. "Out-of-state" means service
credited to a state or local government-administered public defined
benefit plan in another state that is not a defined benefit plan for
teachers.
2. Up to ten (10) years of out-of-state hazardous service. "Out-of-state
hazardous service" means service in a regular full-time position that was
credited to a defined benefit retirement plan administered by a state or
local government in another state, if the service could be certified as
hazardous pursuant to KRS 61.592 or 78.5520, as applicable. The
employee may purchase out-of-state hazardous service under this
subparagraph provided the employee is vested to receive benefits from
Page 10 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
the State Police Retirement System or hazardous duty benefits from the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System or the County Employees
Retirement System.
The employee must purchase out-of-state service or out-of-state hazardous
service in the system in which he or she is vested based solely upon the
service in that system;
(d) Active military duty, which means periods of active military duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States, provided:
1. The employee's military service was terminated in a manner other than
as described in 38 U.S.C. sec. 4304; and
2. The service has not been credited as free military service under
subsection (1) of this section;
(e) National Guard service. An employee may purchase one (1) month of service
for each six (6) months of service in the National Guard or the military
reserves of the United States. The service shall be treated as service earned
prior to participation in the system;
(f) Federal service. "Federal service" means service with the United States
government, that is not service in the Armed Forces;
(g) Seasonal, emergency, interim, probationary, or temporary employment or
part-time employment as provided by KRS 61.510(21) or 78.510(21)
averaging one hundred (100) or more hours of work per month on a calendar
or fiscal year basis. If the average number of hours of work is less than one
hundred (100) per month, the member may purchase credit for only those
months he or she receives creditable compensation for one hundred (100)
hours of work;
(h) Part-time employment in a noncertified position at a school board prior to the
1990-91 school year which averaged eighty (80) or more hours of work per
Page 11 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
month on a calendar or fiscal year basis. If the average number of hours of
work is less than eighty (80) per month, the noncertified employee of a school
board shall be allowed to purchase credit only for those months he or she
receives creditable compensation for eighty (80) hours of work;
(i) Any period of:
1. Authorized maternity leave without pay or sick leave without pay;
2. Unpaid leave authorized under the federal Family and Medical Leave
Act;
3. Approved educational leave; and
4. Agency-approved leave to work for a work-related labor organization if
the agency subsequently participated in the County Employees
Retirement System, but only if the board receives a favorable private
letter ruling from the United States Internal Revenue Service or a
favorable opinion letter from the United States Department of Labor;
(j) Non-participating employer service, which means periods of employment
with the following types of agencies provided the agency does not participate
in a state-administered retirement system:
1. A regional community services program for mental health organized and
operated under the provisions of KRS 210.370 to 210.480;
2. A community action agency created under KRS 273.405 to 273.453.
The service provided by this subparagraph shall be purchased in the
County Employees Retirement System;
3. An area development district created pursuant to KRS 147A.050; or
4. A business development corporation created pursuant to KRS 155.001
to 155.230, provided the system receives a favorable private letter ruling
from the United States Internal Revenue Service or a favorable opinion
letter from the United States Department of Labor;
Page 12 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
(k) Urban-county government service, which means employment in an urban-
county government position that would qualify for hazardous duty coverage
under KRS 61.592 or 78.5520. The provisions of this paragraph shall only be
applicable to vested members participating in the State Police Retirement
System or in a hazardous position in the Kentucky Employees Retirement
System or the County Employees Retirement System;
(l) Periods of service as assistants to officers and employees of the General
Assembly for persons who were unable to acquire service under KRS
61.510(20) for service performed after January 1, 1960;
(m) Service as a volunteer in the Kentucky Peace Corps, created by KRS 154.1-
720; and
(n) Employment with a vocational technical school in a noncertified part-time
position averaging eighty (80) or more hours per month, determined by using
the number of months actually worked within a calendar or fiscal year. The
service provided by this paragraph shall be purchased in the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System.
(6) (a) Non-qualified service. Provided the employee's membership date in the
system is prior to July 15, 2002, and provided the employee has total service
in all state-administered retirement systems of at least one hundred eighty
(180) months of service credit, the employee may purchase a combined
maximum total of five (5) years of service credit, known as non-qualified
service, which is not otherwise purchasable under any of the provisions of
KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852.
(b) The service purchased under this paragraph shall not be used in determining a
retirement allowance until the member has accrued at least two hundred forty
(240) months of service, excluding service purchased under this subsection. If
the member does not accrue at least two hundred forty (240) months of
Page 13 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
service, excluding service purchased under this subsection, upon retirement,
death, or written request following termination, the payment, plus interest as
provided in KRS 16.560, 61.575, or 78.640, as applicable, shall be refunded.
(c) Months of employment in a full-time position that provides services for
Kentucky River Community Care, regardless of whether the member was
employed directly by Kentucky River Community Care or indirectly through
a third-party entity, in which the member did not participate in the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System for the period of employment, may count
toward attaining the necessary two hundred forty (240) months of service
required by paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(7) For purposes of service purchased under subsections (2) to (6) of this section:
(a) Except for subsection (6) of this section, the service must qualify as regular
full-time as provided by KRS 61.510 and 78.510;
(b) No service credit may be purchased for periods already credited to the system
or another public defined benefit retirement fund, including non-qualified
service purchased in another state-administered retirement system;
(c) Except as provided by paragraph (a)2.a. of subsection (9) of this section, the
employee payment for service purchases shall not be picked up, as described
in KRS 16.545(4), 61.560(4), or 78.610(4), by the employer;
(d) Except for service purchased under subsection (2) or (3) of this section,
service purchases made pursuant to this section may be purchased by the
entire amount of service available or by increments. Service purchases made
pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall only be purchased by
the entire amount of service available; and
(e) Service purchases as provided by subsections (5)(b), (d) to (f), and (j)1. and
(6) of this section may be purchased in any system in which the member has
service credit.
Page 14 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
(8) (a) Employer purchase of past service. Any employer participating in the system
may purchase service credit, between July 1, 1956, in the case of the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System, or July 1, 1958, in the case of the
County Employees Retirement System, and the participation date of the
employer, for present employees of the county or department who have
elected coverage under KRS 61.525(2) or 78.540(1), provided the employee
began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014.
(b) A Kentucky Employees Retirement System employer shall pay the cost of the
service credit within the fiscal year the election is made to purchase the
service credit. A County Employees Retirement System employer may
purchase the service, with interest at the rate actuarially assumed by the board,
over a period not to exceed ten (10) years.
(c) If an employer elects to purchase service under the provisions of this
subsection, any present employee who would be eligible to receive service
credit under the provisions of this subsection and has purchased service credit
under subsection (5)(a) of this section shall have his or her payment for the
service credit refunded with interest at the rate paid under KRS 61.575 or
78.640.
(d) Any payments made by an employer under this subsection shall be deposited
to the retirement allowance account of the system and these funds shall not be
considered accumulated contributions of the individual members.
(9) (a) An employee participating in the system may purchase service credit under
any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to
78.852 for which he or she is eligible to purchase, or as otherwise required by
38 U.S.C. ch. 43, by:
1. Making a lump-sum payment on a before-tax basis as provided in
subparagraph 3. of this paragraph, or on an after-tax basis if the
Page 15 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
employee is purchasing service credit under subsection (1) or (3) of this
section, service available pursuant to 38 U.S.C. ch. 43 not otherwise
provided for in this section, or grandfathered service as defined in
paragraph (b) of this subsection;
2. Entering into an agreement to purchase service credit through an
installment purchase of service agreement with the systems as provided
by paragraph (c) of this subsection:
a. On a before-tax basis in which the service is purchased pursuant to
the employer pick-up provisions in 26 U.S.C. sec. 414(h)(2); or
b. On an after-tax basis if the employee is purchasing service credit
under subsection (1) or (3) of this section, service available
pursuant to 38 U.S.C. ch. 43 not otherwise provided for in this
section, or grandfathered service as defined in paragraph (b) of this
subsection; or
3. Transferring funds to the system through a direct trustee-to-trustee
transfer as permitted under the applicable sections of the Internal
Revenue Code and any regulations or rulings issued thereunder, through
a direct rollover as contemplated by and permitted under 26 U.S.C. sec.
401(a)(31) and any regulations or rulings issued thereunder, or through a
rollover of funds pursuant to and permitted under the rules specified in
26 U.S.C. secs. 402(c) and 408(d)(3). The system shall accept the
transfer or rollover to the extent permitted under the rules specified in
the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and any
regulations and rulings issued thereunder.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "grandfathered service" means service
purchases for which a member, whose membership date in the system is prior
to July 1, 1999, is eligible to purchase under KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to
Page 16 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852, that were available for all members of the system
to purchase on August 5, 1997.
(c) 1. For service purchased under a before-tax or after-tax installment
purchase of service agreement as provided by paragraph (a)2. of this
subsection, the cost of the service shall be computed in the same manner
as for a lump-sum payment which shall be the principal, except that
interest compounded annually at the actuarial rate in effect at the time
the member elects to make the purchase shall be added for the period
that the installments are to be made.
2. Multiple service purchases may be combined under a single installment
agreement, except that no employee may make more than one (1)
installment purchase at the same time.
3. For after-tax installment purchase of service agreements, the employee
may elect to stop the installment payments by notifying the system; may
have the installment purchase recalculated to add one (1) or more
additional service purchases; or may pay by lump sum the remaining
principal or a portion of the remaining principal.
4. Before-tax installment purchase of service agreements shall be
irrevocable, and the employee shall not be able to stop installment
payments or to pay off the remaining balance of the purchase of service
agreement, except upon termination of employment or death.
5. One (1) year of installment payments shall be made for each one
thousand dollars ($1,000) or any part thereof of the total cost, except
that the total period allowed for installments shall not be less than one
(1) year and shall not exceed five (5) years.
6. The employee shall pay the installments by payroll deduction for after-
tax purchase of service agreements, and the employer shall pick up
Page 17 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
installments for before-tax purchase of service agreements. Upon
notification by the system, the employer shall report the installment
payments monthly continuously over each twelve (12) month period at
the same time as, but separate from, regular employee contributions on
the forms or by the computer format specified by the board.
7. The system shall determine how much of the total cost represents
payment for one (1) month of the service to be purchased and shall
credit one (1) month of service to the member's account each time this
amount has been paid. The first service credited shall represent the first
calendar month of the service to be purchased and each succeeding
month of service credit shall represent the succeeding months of that
service.
8. If the employee utilizing an installment purchase of service agreement
dies, retires, does not continue employment in a position required to
participate in the system, or elects to stop an after-tax installment
purchase of service agreement, the member, or in the case of death, the
beneficiary, shall have sixty (60) days to pay the remaining principal or
a portion of the remaining principal of the installment purchase of
service agreement by lump sum, subject to the restrictions of paragraph
(a)1. of this subsection, or by transfer of funds under paragraph (a)3. of
this subsection, except that payment by the member shall be filed with
the system prior to the member's effective retirement date. If the
member or beneficiary does not pay the remaining cost, the system shall
refund to the member or the beneficiary the payment, payments, or
portion of a payment that does not represent a full month of service
purchased, except as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
9. If the employer does not report installment payments on an employee
Page 18 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
for sixty (60) days for an after-tax installment purchase of service
agreement, except in the case of employees on military leave or sick
leave without pay, the installment purchase shall cease and the system
shall refund to the employee the payment, payments, or portion of a
payment that does not represent a full month of service purchased.
10. Installment payments of employees on military leave or sick leave
without pay shall be suspended during the period of leave and shall
resume without recalculation upon the employee's return from leave.
11. If payments have ceased under subparagraph 8. or 9. of this paragraph
and the member later becomes a participating employee in the County
Employees Retirement System, Kentucky Employees Retirement
System, or State Police Retirement System, the employee may complete
the adjusted original installment purchase by lump sum or installment
payments, subject to the restrictions of this subsection. If the employee
elects to renew the installment purchase, the cost of the remaining
service shall be recalculated in accordance with subsection (10) of this
section.
(d) Member payments, including interest, properly received pursuant to this
subsection, shall be deposited to the member's account and considered as
accumulated contributions of the individual member.
(10) (a) The cost of purchasing service credit under any provision of this section,
except as provided by subsections (1) to (3) of this section, shall be
determined by multiplying the higher of the employee's current rate of pay,
final rate of pay, or final compensation as of the end of the month in which
the purchase is made times the actuarial factor times the number of years of
service being purchased. The actuarial factor used to determine the cost of
purchasing service credit shall assume the earliest date the member may retire
Page 19 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
without a reduction in benefits and the cost-of-living adjustments provided to
members upon retirement.
(b) Service purchased on or after August 1, 2004, under the provisions of KRS
16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852, except for service
purchased under subsections (1) to (3) of this section or service purchased as
described by paragraph (d) of this subsection, shall not be used to determine
eligibility for or the amount of the monthly insurance contribution under KRS
61.702 or 78.5536.
(c) For a member whose membership date is on or after August 1, 2004, service
purchased under the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or
78.510 to 78.852, except for service purchased under subsections (1) to (3) of
this section or service purchased as described by paragraph (d) of this
subsection:
1. Shall not be used to determine eligibility for a retirement allowance
under disability retirement, early retirement, normal retirement, or upon
death of the member under any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to
16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510 to 78.852; and
2. Shall only be used to determine the amount of the retirement allowance
of a member who is eligible for a retirement allowance under disability,
early retirement, normal retirement, or upon death of the member under
any of the provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, or
78.510 to 78.852, based on service earned as a participating employee.
(d) Paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection shall not apply to a member who was
bound by an educational contract as a conditional employee to the state of
Kentucky prior to December 31, 2003, regardless of membership date in the
system. Educational leave, seasonal service, or any other qualified service
purchased by a member with this classification under this section shall be
Page 20 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 488
used to determine eligibility for benefits, membership dates, and the amount
of benefit for:
1. A retirement allowance under disability retirement, early retirement,
normal retirement, or death under any of the provisions of KRS 16.505
to 16.652, 61.510 to 61.705, and 78.510 to 78.852; and
2. The monthly insurance contribution under KRS 61.702 or 78.5536.
Page 21 of 21
XXXX 12/27/2024 3:51 PM Jacketed